Illinois, session 104th, SB1064.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 5changing Section 1A-103 as follows: 6    (40 ILCS 5/1A-103)7    Sec. 1A-103. Rules. The The Department is authorized to 8promulgate rules necessary for the administration and 9enforcement of this Code. Except as otherwise provided under 10this Code, these rules shall apply only to pension funds 11established under Article 3 or Article 4 of this Code. Rules 12adopted pursuant to this Section shall govern where conflict 13with local rules and regulations exists.14(Source: P.A. 90-507, eff. 8-22-97.)